Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GREATER TWIN CITIES UNITED WAY.new text end new text begin $2,800,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,800,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for a grant to Greater Twin Cities United Way to expand services for call follow-up, operational support, outreach efforts, and increased support for callers. new text end